District of Columbia statutes.
8-440

Rules.

(a)

Within 570 days of October 23, 2012, the Mayor shall issue rules to implement the provisions of §§ 8-431 through 8-439.

(b)

For rules issued pursuant to § 8-432, the Department shall afford great weight to the decisions made pursuant to section 18 of the FIFRA [7 U.S.C. § 136p].

Oct. 23, 2012, D.C. Law 19-191, § 11, 59 DCR 10166
Section 14(a) of D.C. Law 19-191 provided that §§ 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, and 13 of the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.